Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 5. Discharge from Imprisonment; Poor Debtors

§ 3671.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§§ 3672-3687.
Repealed.
1979, No. 67, § 9, eff. date, see note set out below.

§ 3688.
Repealed. 2005, No. 174 (Adj. Sess.), § 140(2).

§ 3689.
Application for discharge; hearing; oath.

When the petition is granted, after the time fixed by the court or justice, the prisoner may apply to the commissioners of jail delivery in the county for a discharge from imprisonment.
After giving notice to the opposite party before such examination, as provided in other cases in this chapter, if they find on examination that such person has not property, except his or her wearing apparel, exceeding $20.00, the commissioners shall administer to him or her the following oath:

“You solemnly swear that you have not estate, real or personal, exceeding $20.00, except your wearing apparel, and that you have not disposed of any of your property for the purpose of defrauding the complainant in the proceedings on which you are committed.
So help you God.”

§ 3690.
Effect of discharge.

Upon taking such oath, the prisoner shall be discharged as other persons are discharged upon taking the poor debtor’s oath, and shall thereafter be free from arrest or imprisonment upon an execution issued upon any judgment rendered in such bastardy proceedings or founded thereon.
The judgment shall remain in force, and the plaintiff may have execution against his or her property for nonpayment of orders of court, or may sustain an action of contract thereon.

§§ 3691-3693.
Repealed. 1979, No. 67, § 9, eff. date, see note set out below.